District of Columbia statutes.
24-211.24

Procedure and employee impact.

The drug testing policy shall be issued in advance to inform employees and allow them the opportunity to seek treatment. Thereafter, any confirmed positive test results or a refusal to submit to the test shall be grounds for termination of employment in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 6 of Title 1. This testing program is for all employees, including management, and shall be implemented as a single Department program. The results of a random test may not be turned over to any law enforcement agency without the employee’s written consent.

Sept. 20, 1996, D.C. Law 11-158, § 5, 43 DCR 3702
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 24-211.21.
Temporary addition of subchapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 24-211.21.
1981 Ed., § 24-448.4.